Texas, session 892, HB197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  (a) The Department of State Health Services shall conduct a study on establishing testing and scientific standards for determining tetrahydrocannabinol intoxication. (b)  The study conducted under this section must: (1)  evaluate available and emerging methods of testing for tetrahydrocannabinol intoxication; (2)  evaluate the establishment of a scientifically valid threshold for intoxication, comparable to the standards applicable to blood alcohol content, for use in the prosecution of offenses under Chapter 49, Penal Code, legal proceedings determining criminal or civil liability, and workplace safety standards, policies, and regulations; and (3)  create legislative recommendations based on the findings under Subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection. (c)  Not later than October 1, 2026, the Department of State Health Services shall submit a report on the study conducted under this section, including any legislative recommendations, to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and presiding officer of each standing legislative committee with jurisdiction over cannabinoid regulation, intoxication offenses, or workplace safety. (d)  This section expires December 1, 2026. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.